District of Columbia statutes.
19-101.06

Penalties.

Whoever, with respect to the allowances or exemptions authorized by sections 19-101.01 to 19-101.05 , (1) makes a false affidavit, (2) willfully violates an order of the Probate Division, or (3) willfully violates a provision of this chapter, shall be fined not more than $2,500 for each offense.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 801(c), 48 DCR 2087